District of Columbia statutes.
4-1401

Purpose of subchapter.

The purpose of this subchapter is to secure for each child under 16 years of age who is placed in a family home, other than his own or that of a relative within the third degree, such care and guidance as will serve the child’s welfare and the best interests of the District of Columbia; and to secure for him custody and care as near as possible to that which should have been given him by his parents.

Apr. 22, 1944, 58 Stat. 193, ch. 174, § 1
Adoption, generally, see § 16-301 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 32-1001.
1973 Ed., § 32-781.